California statutes. Labor Code
(b) (1) Nothing in this section shall allow a labor-management agreement that diminishes the entitlement of an employee to compensation payments for total or partial disability, temporary disability, vocational rehabilitation, or medical treatment fully paid by the employer as otherwise provided in this division; nor shall any agreement authorized by this section deny to any employee the right to representation by counsel
 at all stages during the alternative dispute resolution process. The portion of any agreement that violates this paragraph shall be declared null and void.

(2) The parties may negotiate any aspect of the delivery of medical benefits and the delivery of disability compensation to employees of the employer or group of employers that are eligible for group health benefits and nonoccupational disability benefits through their employer.

(c) Subdivision (a) shall apply only to the following:

(1) An employer developing or projecting an annual workers’ compensation insurance premium, in California, of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or more, and employing at least 50 employees, or any employer that paid an annual workers’ compensation insurance premium, in California, of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), and employing at
 least 50 employees in at least one of the previous three years.

(2) Groups of employers engaged in a workers’ compensation safety group complying with Sections 11656.6 and 11656.7 of the Insurance Code, and established pursuant to a joint labor management safety committee or committees, that develops or projects annual workers’ compensation insurance premiums of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) or more.

(3) Employers or groups of employers, including cities and counties, that are self-insured in compliance with Section 3700 that would have projected annual workers’ compensation costs that meet the requirements of, and that meet the other requirements of, paragraph (1) in the case of employers, or paragraph (2) in the case of groups of employers.

(4) The State of California.

(d) Any recognized or certified exclusive bargaining representative in an industry not covered by Section 3201.5, may file a petition with the administrative director seeking permission to negotiate with an employer or group of employers to enter into a labor-management agreement pursuant to this section. The petition shall specify the bargaining unit or units to be included, the names of the employers or groups of employers, and shall be accompanied by proof of the labor union’s status as the exclusive bargaining representative. The current collective bargaining agreement or agreements shall be attached to the petition. The petition shall be in the form designated by the administrative director. Upon receipt of the petition, the administrative director shall promptly verify the petitioner’s status as the exclusive bargaining representative. If the petition satisfies the requirements set forth in this subdivision, the administrative director shall
 issue a letter advising each employer and labor representative of their eligibility to enter into negotiations, for a period not to exceed one year, for the purpose of reaching agreement on a labor-management agreement pursuant to this section. The parties may jointly request, and shall be granted, by the administrative director, an additional one-year period to negotiate an agreement.

(e) No employer may establish or continue a program established under this section until it has provided the administrative director with all of the following:

(1) Upon its original application and whenever it is renegotiated thereafter, a copy of the labor-management agreement and the approximate number of employees who will be covered thereby.

(2) Upon its original application and annually thereafter, a statement signed under penalty
 of perjury, that no action has been taken by any administrative agency or court of the United States to invalidate the labor-management agreement.

(3) The name, address, and telephone number of the contact person of the employer.

(4) Any other information that the administrative director deems necessary to further the purposes of this section.

(f) No collective bargaining representative may establish or continue to participate in a program established under this section unless all of the following requirements are met:

(1) Upon its original application and annually thereafter, it has provided to the administrative director a copy of its most recent LM-2 or LM-3 filing with the United States Department of Labor, where such filing is required by law,
 along with a statement, signed under penalty of perjury, that the document is a true and correct copy.

(2) It has provided to the administrative director the name, address, and telephone number of the contact person or persons of the collective bargaining representative or representatives.

(g) Commencing July 1, 2005, and annually thereafter, the Division of Workers’ Compensation shall report to the Director of Industrial Relations the number of labor-management agreements received and the number of employees covered by these agreements.

(h) The data obtained by the administrative director pursuant to this section shall be confidential and not subject to public disclosure under any law of this state. However, the Division of Workers’ Compensation shall create derivative works pursuant to subdivision (g) based on the
 labor-management agreements and data. Those derivative works shall not be confidential, but shall be public. On a monthly basis, the administrative director shall make available an updated list of employers and unions entering into labor-management agreements authorized by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 363, Sec. 9.   (SB 863)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

3201.81.

In the horse racing industry, the organization certified by the California Horse Racing Board to represent the majority of licensed jockeys pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 19612.9 of the Business and Professions Code is the labor organization authorized to negotiate the collective bargaining agreement establishing an alternative dispute resolution system for licensed jockeys pursuant to Section 3201.7.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 130, Sec. 184.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

3201.9.

(a) On or before June 30, 2004, and biannually thereafter, the report required in subdivision (i) of Section 3201.5 and subdivision (h) of Section 3201.7 shall include updated loss experience for all employers and groups of employers participating in a program established under those sections. The report shall include updated data on each item set forth in subdivision (i) of Section 3201.5 and subdivision (h) of Section 3201.7 for the previous year for injuries in 2003 and beyond. Updates for each program shall be done for the original
 program year and for subsequent years. The insurers, the Department of Insurance, and the rating organization designated by the Insurance Commissioner pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 11750) of Chapter 3 of Part 3 of Division 2 of the Insurance Code, shall provide the administrative director with any information that the administrative director determines is reasonably necessary to conduct the study.

(b) Commencing on and after June 30, 2004, the Insurance Commissioner, or the commissioner’s designee, shall prepare for inclusion in the report required in subdivision (i) of Section 3201.5 and subdivision (h) of Section 3201.7 a review of both of the following:

(1) The adequacy of rates charged for these programs, including the impact of scheduled credits and debits.

(2) The comparative results for these
 programs with other programs not subject to Section 3201.5 or Section 3201.7.

(c) Upon completion of the report, the administrative director shall report the findings to the Legislature, the Department of Insurance, the designated rating organization, and the programs and insurers participating in the study.

(d) The data obtained by the administrative director pursuant to this section shall be confidential and not subject to public disclosure under any law of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 34, Sec. 8.   Effective April 19, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

3202.

This division and Division 5 (commencing with Section 6300) shall be liberally construed by the courts with the purpose of extending their benefits for the protection of persons injured in the course of their employment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 248, Sec. 158.)
-------------------------------------------

3202.5.

All parties and lien claimants shall meet the evidentiary burden of proof on all issues by a preponderance of the evidence in order that all parties are considered equal before the law. “Preponderance of the evidence” means that evidence that, when weighed with that opposed to it, has more convincing force and the greater probability of truth. When weighing the evidence, the test is not the relative number of witnesses, but the relative convincing force of the evidence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 34, Sec. 9.   Effective April 19, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

3203.

This division and Division 5 (commencing with Section 6300) do not apply to employers or employments which, according to law, are so engaged in interstate commerce as not to be subject to the legislative power of the state, nor to employees injured while they are so engaged, except in so far as these divisions are permitted to apply under the Constitution or laws of the United States.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 248, Sec. 159.)
-------------------------------------------

3204.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions hereinafter set forth in this chapter shall govern the construction and meaning of the terms and phrases used in this division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

3205.

“Division” means the Division of Workers’ Compensation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1097, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

3205.5.

“Appeals board” means the Workers’ Compensation Appeals Board of the Division of Workers’ Compensation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1097, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

3206.

“Administrative director” means the Director of the Division of Workers’ Compensation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1097, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

3206.5.

For the purpose of this division and subject to restrictions or requirements that may be adopted by the administrative director or the Workers’ Compensation Appeals Board, documents that require a signature, including the signature of a notary on an acknowledgment, may be filed with an “electronic signature,” defined as an electronic sound, symbol, or process attached to or logically associated with an electronic record and executed or adopted by a person with the intent to sign the electronic record, where the electronic signature is attributable to a person per the requirements of Title 2.5 (commencing with Section 1633.1) of Part 2 of Division 3 of the Civil Code or Section 16.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 392, Sec. 2.   (AB 2337)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

3207.

“Compensation” means compensation under this division and includes every benefit or payment conferred by this division upon an injured employee, or in the event of his or her death, upon his or her dependents, without regard to negligence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 34, Sec. 10.   Effective April 19, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

3208.

“Injury” includes any injury or disease arising out of the employment, including injuries to artificial members, dentures, hearing aids, eyeglasses and medical braces of all types; provided, however, that eyeglasses and hearing aids will not be replaced, repaired, or otherwise compensated for, unless injury to them is incident to an injury causing disability.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1064.)
-------------------------------------------

3208.05.

(a) “Injury” includes a reaction to or a side effect arising from health care provided by an employer to a health care worker, which health care is intended to prevent the development or manifestation of any bloodborne disease, illness, syndrome, or condition recognized as occupationally incurred by Cal-OSHA, the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, or other appropriate governmental entities. This section shall apply only to preventive health care that the employer provided to a health care worker under the following circumstances: (1) prior to an exposure because of risk of occupational exposure to such a disease, illness, syndrome, or condition, or (2) where the preventive care is provided as a consequence of a documented
 exposure to blood or bodily fluid containing blood that arose out of and in the course of employment. Such a disease, illness, syndrome, or condition includes, but is not limited to, hepatitis, and the human immunodeficiency virus. Such preventive health care, and any disability indemnity or other benefits required as a result of the preventive health care provided by the employer, shall be compensable under the workers’ compensation system. The employer may require the health care worker to document that the employer provided the preventive health care and that the reaction or side effects arising from the preventive health care resulted in lost work time, health care costs, or other costs normally compensable under workers’ compensation.

(b) The benefits of this section shall not be provided to a health care worker for a reaction to or side effect from health care intended to prevent the development of the human immunodeficiency virus if the
 worker claims a work-related exposure and if the worker tests positive within 48 hours of that exposure to a test to determine the presence of the human immunodeficiency virus.

(c) For purposes of this section, “health care worker” includes any person who is an employee of a provider of health care as defined in Section 56.05 of the Civil Code, and who is exposed to human blood or other bodily fluids contaminated with blood in the course of employment, including, but not limited to, a registered nurse, a licensed vocational nurse, a certified nurse aide, clinical laboratory technologist, dental hygienist, physician, janitor, and housekeeping worker. “Health care worker” does not include an employee who provides employee health services for an employer primarily engaged in a business other than providing health care.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 444, Sec. 19.   (SB 138)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

3208.1.

An injury may be either: (a) “specific,” occurring as the result of one incident or exposure which causes disability or need for medical treatment; or (b) “cumulative,” occurring as repetitive mentally or physically traumatic activities extending over a period of time, the combined effect of which causes any disability or need for medical treatment. The date of a cumulative injury shall be the date determined under Section 5412.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1024.)
-------------------------------------------

3208.2.

When disability, need for medical treatment, or death results from the combined effects of two or more injuries, either specific, cumulative, or both, all questions of fact and law shall be separately determined with respect to each such injury, including, but not limited to, the apportionment between such injuries of liability for disability benefits, the cost of medical treatment, and any death benefit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

3208.3.

(a) A psychiatric injury shall be compensable if it is a mental disorder which causes disability or need for medical treatment, and it is diagnosed pursuant to procedures promulgated under paragraph (4) of subdivision (j) of Section 139.2 or, until these procedures are promulgated, it is diagnosed using the terminology and criteria of the American Psychiatric Association’s Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, Third Edition-Revised, or the terminology and diagnostic criteria of other psychiatric diagnostic manuals generally approved and accepted nationally by practitioners in the field of psychiatric medicine.

(b) (1) In order to establish that a psychiatric injury is compensable, an
 employee shall demonstrate by a preponderance of the evidence that actual events of employment were predominant as to all causes combined of the psychiatric injury.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), in the case of employees whose injuries resulted from being a victim of a violent act or from direct exposure to a significant violent act, the employee shall be required to demonstrate by a preponderance of the evidence that actual events of employment were a substantial cause of the injury.

(3) For the purposes of this section, “substantial cause” means at least 35 to 40 percent of the causation from all sources combined.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to establish a new and higher threshold of compensability for psychiatric injury under this division.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, no compensation shall be paid pursuant to this division for a psychiatric injury related to a claim against an employer unless the employee has been employed by that employer for at least six months. The six months of employment need not be continuous. This subdivision shall not apply if the psychiatric injury is caused by a sudden and extraordinary employment condition. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to authorize an employee, or the employee’s dependents, to bring an action at law or equity for damages against the employer for a psychiatric injury, where those rights would not exist pursuant to the exclusive remedy doctrine set forth in Section 3602 in the absence of the amendment of this section by the act adding this subdivision.

(e) Where the claim for compensation is filed after notice of termination of
 employment or layoff, including voluntary layoff, and the claim is for an injury occurring prior to the time of notice of termination or layoff, no compensation shall be paid unless the employee demonstrates by a preponderance of the evidence that actual events of employment were predominant as to all causes combined of the psychiatric injury and one or more of the following conditions exist:

(1) Sudden and extraordinary events of employment were the cause of the injury.

(2) The employer has notice of the psychiatric injury under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 5400) prior to the notice of termination or layoff.

(3) The employee’s medical records existing prior to notice of termination or layoff contain evidence of treatment of the psychiatric injury.

(4) Upon a finding of sexual or racial harassment by any trier of fact, whether contractual, administrative, regulatory, or judicial.

(5) Evidence that the date of injury, as specified in Section 5411 or 5412, is subsequent to the date of the notice of termination or layoff, but prior to the effective date of the termination or layoff.

(f) For purposes of this section, an employee provided notice pursuant to Sections 44948.5, 44949, 44951, 44955, 44955.6, 72411, 87740, and 87743 of the Education Code shall be considered to have been provided a notice of termination or layoff only upon a district’s final decision not to reemploy that person.

(g) A notice of termination or layoff that is not followed within 60 days by that termination or layoff shall not be subject to the provisions of this subdivision,
 and this subdivision shall not apply until receipt of a later notice of termination or layoff. The issuance of frequent notices of termination or layoff to an employee shall be considered a bad faith personnel action and shall make this subdivision inapplicable to the employee.

(h) No compensation under this division shall be paid by an employer for a psychiatric injury if the injury was substantially caused by a lawful, nondiscriminatory, good faith personnel action. The burden of proof shall rest with the party asserting the issue.

(i) When a psychiatric injury claim is filed against an employer, and an application for adjudication of claim is filed by an employer or employee, the division shall provide the employer with information concerning psychiatric injury prevention programs.

(j) An employee who is an
 inmate, as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 3351, or their family on behalf of an inmate, shall not be entitled to compensation for a psychiatric injury except as provided in subdivision (d) of Section 3370.

(k) An employee who is a patient, as defined in subdivision (h) of Section 3351, or their family on behalf of a patient, shall not be entitled to compensation for a psychiatric injury except as provided in subdivision (d) of Section 3370.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 38, Sec. 32.   (SB 78)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

3208.4.

In any proceeding under this division involving an injury arising out of alleged conduct that constitutes sexual harassment, sexual assault, or sexual battery, any party seeking discovery concerning sexual conduct of the applicant with any person other than the defendant, whether consensual or nonconsensual or prior or subsequent to the alleged act complained of, shall establish specific facts showing good cause for that discovery on a noticed motion to the appeals board. The motion shall not be made or considered at an ex parte hearing.

The procedures set forth in Section 783 of the Evidence Code shall be followed if evidence of sexual conduct of the applicant is offered to attack his or her credibility. Opinion evidence, evidence of reputation, and evidence of specific instances of sexual conduct of the applicant with any person other than the defendant, or any of such evidence, is not admissible by the defendant to prove consent by or the absence of injury to the applicant, unless the injury alleged by the applicant is in the nature of loss of consortium.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 121, Sec. 24.   Effective July 16, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

3209.

“Damages” means the recovery allowed in an action at law as contrasted with compensation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

3209.3.

(a) “Physician” includes physicians and surgeons holding an M.D. or D.O. degree, psychologists, acupuncturists, optometrists, dentists, podiatrists, and chiropractic practitioners licensed by California state law and within the scope of their practice as defined by California state law.

(b) “Psychologist” means a licensed psychologist with a doctoral degree in psychology, or a doctoral degree deemed equivalent for licensure by the Board of Psychology pursuant to Section 2914 of
 the Business and Professions Code, and who either has at least two years of clinical experience in a recognized health setting or has met the standards of the National Register of the Health Service Providers in Psychology.

(c) When treatment or evaluation for an injury is provided by a psychologist, provision shall be made for appropriate medical collaboration when requested by the employer or the insurer.

(d) “Acupuncturist” means a person who holds an acupuncturist’s certificate issued pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 4925) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.

(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize acupuncturists to determine disability for the purposes of Article 3 (commencing with Section 4650) of Chapter 2 of Part 2, or under Section 2708 of the Unemployment
 Insurance Code.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 26, Sec. 1) by Stats. 1997, Ch. 98, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

3209.4.

The inclusion of optometrists in Section 3209.3 does not imply any right or entitle any optometrist to represent, advertise, or hold himself out as a physician.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1404.)
-------------------------------------------

3209.5.

Medical, surgical, and hospital treatment, including nursing, medicines, medical and surgical supplies, crutches, and apparatus, includes, but is not limited to, services and supplies by physical therapists, licensed clinical social workers, chiropractic practitioners, and acupuncturists, as licensed by California state law and within the scope of their practice as defined by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 609, Sec. 2.   (SB 1002)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

3209.6.

The inclusion of chiropractors in Sections 3209.3 and 3209.5 does not imply any right or entitle any chiropractor to represent, advertise, or hold himself out as a physician.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 629.)
-------------------------------------------

3209.7.

Treatment of injuries at the expense of the employer may also include, either in addition to or in place of medical, surgical, and hospital services, as specified in Section 3209.5, any other form of therapy, treatment, or healing practice agreed upon voluntarily in writing, between the employee and his employer. Such agreement may be entered into at any time after employment and shall be in a form approved by the Department of Industrial Relations, and shall include at least the following items:

(a) A description of the form of healing practice intended to be relied upon and designation of individuals and
 facilities qualified to administer it.

(b) The employee shall not by entering into such an agreement or by selecting such therapy, treatment or healing practice, waive any rights conferred upon him by law, or forfeit any benefits to which he might otherwise be entitled.

(c) The employer and the employee shall each reserve the right to terminate such agreement upon seven days written notice to the other party.

No liability shall be incurred by the employer under the provisions of this section, except as provided for in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 3600), of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1250.)
-------------------------------------------

3209.8.

Treatment reasonably required to cure or relieve from the effects of an injury shall include the services of marriage and family therapists, professional clinical counselors, and clinical social workers licensed by California state law and within the scope of their practice as defined by California state law if the injured person is referred to the marriage and family therapist, the professional clinical counselor, or the clinical social worker by a licensed physician and surgeon, with the approval of the employer, for treatment of a condition arising out of the injury. This section does not authorize marriage and family therapists, professional clinical counselors, or clinical social workers to determine disability
 for the purposes of Article 3 (commencing with Section 4650) of Chapter 2 of Part 2. The requirement of this section that the employer approve the referral by a licensed physician or surgeon shall not be construed to preclude reimbursement for self-procured treatment, found by the appeals board to be otherwise compensable pursuant to this division, if the employer has refused to authorize any treatment for the condition arising from the injury treated by the marriage and family therapist, professional clinical counselor, or clinical social worker.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 389, Sec. 18.   (AB 2296)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

3209.9.

The inclusion of acupuncturists in Section 3209.3 does not imply any right or entitle any acupuncturist to represent, advertise, or hold himself or herself out as a physician or surgeon holding an M.D. or D.O. degree.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 98, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

3209.10.

(a) Medical treatment of a work-related injury required to cure or relieve the effects of the injury may be provided by a state licensed physician assistant or nurse practitioner, acting under the review or supervision of a physician and surgeon pursuant to standardized procedures or protocols within their lawfully authorized scope of practice. The reviewing or supervising physician and surgeon of the physician assistant or nurse practitioner shall be deemed to be the treating physician. For the purposes of this section, “medical treatment”
 includes the authority of the nurse practitioner or physician assistant to authorize the patient to receive time off from work for a period not to exceed three calendar days if that authority is included in a standardized procedure or protocol approved by the supervising physician. The nurse practitioner or physician assistant may cosign the Doctor’s First Report of Occupational Injury or Illness. The treating physician shall make any determination of temporary disability and shall sign the report.

(b) The provision of subdivision (a) that requires the cosignature of the treating physician applies to this section only and it is not the intent of the Legislature that the requirement apply to any other section of law or to any other statute or regulation. Nothing in this section implies that a nurse practitioner or physician assistant is a physician as defined in Section 3209.3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 100, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

3209.11.

(a) An employer, workers’ compensation insurer, self-insured employer, or agent of an employer, insurer, or self-insured employer may provide an employee with access to the services of a licensed clinical social worker acting within their scope of practice. 

(b) Medical provider networks may add licensed clinical social workers to the physician providers listing in the networks established or modified pursuant to Section 4616.

(c) For purposes of this section, “licensed clinical social worker” means a licensed clinical social worker with a master’s degree in clinical social work, or a degree deemed equivalent for licensure by the Board of Behavioral Sciences pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 4996) of Chapter 14 of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code, and who either has at least two years of clinical experience in a recognized health setting or has met the standards of the Association of Social Work Boards.

(d) This section does not authorize licensed clinical social workers to determine disability for the purposes of Article 3 (commencing with Section 4650) of Chapter 2 of Part 2, or under Section 2708 of the Unemployment Insurance Code.

(e) This section authorizes a licensed clinical social worker to treat or evaluate an injured worker only upon referral from a physician as defined in Section 3209.3.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 609, Sec. 3.   (SB 1002)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

3210.

“Person” includes an individual, firm, voluntary association, or a public, quasi public, or private corporation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

3211.

“Insurer” includes the State Compensation Insurance Fund and any private company, corporation, mutual association, reciprocal or interinsurance exchange authorized under the laws of this State to insure employers against liability for compensation and any employer to whom a certificate of consent to self-insure has been issued.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

3211.5.

For purposes of this division, whenever the term “firefighter,” “firefighting member,” and “member of a fire department” is used, the term shall include, but shall not be limited to, unless the context expressly provides otherwise, a person engaged in providing firefighting services who is an apprentice, volunteer, or employee on a partly paid or fully paid basis.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 870, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

3211.9.

“Disaster council” means a public agency established by ordinance which is empowered to register and direct the activities of disaster service workers within the area of the county, city, city and county, or any part thereof, and is thus, because of such registration and direction, acting as an instrumentality of the state in aid of the carrying out of the general governmental functions and policy of the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 38.)
-------------------------------------------

3211.91.

“Accredited disaster council” means a disaster council that is certified by the Office of Emergency Services as conforming with the rules and regulations established by the office pursuant to Article 10 (commencing with Section 8610) of Chapter 7 of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code. A disaster council remains accredited only while the certification of the Office of Emergency Services is in effect and is not revoked.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 400.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

3211.92.

(a) “Disaster service worker” means any natural person who is registered with an accredited disaster council or a state agency for the purpose of engaging in disaster service pursuant to the California Emergency Services Act without pay or other consideration.

(b) “Disaster service worker” includes public employees performing disaster work that is outside the course and scope of their regular employment without pay and also includes any unregistered person impressed into
 service during a state of war emergency, a state of emergency, or a local emergency by a person having authority to command the aid of citizens in the execution of his or her duties.

(c) Persons registered with a disaster council at the time that council becomes accredited need not reregister in order to be entitled to the benefits provided by Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 4351).

(d) “Disaster service worker” does not include any member registered as an active firefighting member of any regularly organized volunteer fire department, having official recognition, and full or partial support of the county, city, or district in which the fire department is located.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 506, Sec. 33.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

3211.93.

“Disaster service” means all activities authorized by and carried on pursuant to the California Emergency Services Act, including training necessary or proper to engage in such activities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 438.)
-------------------------------------------

3211.93a.

“Disaster service” does not include any activities or functions performed by a person if the accredited disaster council with which that person is registered receives a fee or other compensation for the performance of those activities or functions by that person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 506, Sec. 34.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

3212.

(a) (1) In the case of members of a sheriff’s office or the California Highway Patrol, district attorney’s staff of inspectors and investigators or of police or fire departments of cities, counties, cities and counties, districts or other public or municipal corporations or political subdivisions, whether those members are volunteer, partly paid, or fully paid, and in the case of active firefighting members of the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection whose duties require firefighting or of any county forestry or firefighting department or unit, whether voluntary, fully paid, or partly paid, and in the case of members of the warden service of the Wildlife Protection Branch of the Department of
 Fish and Game whose principal duties consist of active law enforcement service, excepting those whose principal duties are clerical or otherwise do not clearly fall within the scope of active law enforcement service such as stenographers, telephone operators, and other officeworkers, the term “injury” as used in this act includes hernia when any part of the hernia develops or manifests itself during a period while the member is in the service in the office, staff, division, department, or unit, and in the case of members of fire departments, except those whose principal duties are clerical, such as stenographers, telephone operators, and other officeworkers, and in the case of county forestry or firefighting departments, except those whose principal duties are clerical, such as stenographers, telephone operators, and other officeworkers, and in the case of active firefighting members of the
 Department of Forestry and Fire Protection whose duties require firefighting, and in the case of members of the warden
 service of the Wildlife Protection Branch of the Department of Fish and Game whose principal duties consist of active law enforcement service, excepting those whose principal duties are clerical or otherwise do not clearly fall within the scope of active law enforcement service such as stenographers, telephone operators, and other officeworkers, the term “injury” includes pneumonia and heart trouble that develops or manifests itself during a period while the member is in the service of the office, staff, department, or unit. In the case of regular salaried county or city and county peace officers, the term “injury” also includes any hernia that manifests itself or develops during a period while the officer is in the service. The compensation that is awarded for the hernia, heart trouble, or pneumonia shall include full hospital, surgical, medical treatment, disability indemnity, and death
 benefits, as provided by the workers’ compensation laws of this state.

(2) The hernia, heart trouble, or pneumonia so developing or manifesting itself in those cases shall be presumed to arise out of and in the course of the employment. This presumption is disputable and may be controverted by other evidence, but unless so controverted, the appeals board is bound to find in accordance with it. The presumption shall be extended to a member following termination of service for a period of three calendar months for each full year of the requisite service, but not to exceed 60 months in any circumstance, commencing with the last date actually worked in the specified capacity.

(3) The hernia, heart trouble, or pneumonia so developing or manifesting itself in those cases shall
 in no case be attributed to any disease existing prior to that development or manifestation.

(b) This section also applies to all of the following, for injuries occurring on or after January 1, 2026:

(1) Active firefighting members of a fire department that serves a United States Department of Defense installation and who are certified by the United States Department of Defense as meeting its standards for firefighters.
